Maryland, session 2026, HB1628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–206.1.
(e) (1) Within 30 days of receipt of a notice of an institution’s intent to submit
a new program to the Commission in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the
Commission may file, or the institutions of higher education in the State may file with the
Commission, an objection to implementation of a proposed [graduate] program provided
the objection is based on:
(i) Inconsistency of the proposed program with the institution’s
approved mission for a public institution of higher education and the mission statement
published in the official catalog of a private nonprofit institution of higher education;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1628*

HOUSE BILL 1628
(ii) Not meeting a regional or statewide need consistent with the
State Plan for Higher Education;
(iii) Unreasonable program duplication which would cause harm to
the State or students attending institutions of higher education in the State; or
(iv) Unnecessary program duplication in violation of the State’s
equal educational opportunity obligations under State and federal law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.